Florida, session 2026, HB533.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 533 2026
Section 1. Section 393.0665, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
393.0665 Communication Bill of Rights for Individuals with
Disabilities.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Alternative communication method" means a
communication technique or device that is evidence-based or
recognized by relevant professional organizations, including,
but not limited to, the American Speech-Language-Hearing
Association, and that allows an individual with a disability to
communicate independently without improper influence.
(b) "Health care provider" means any facility licensed
under this chapter or a provider as defined in s. 408.803.
(c) "Individual with a disability" means a person with a
developmental disability as defined in s. 393.063; a physical or
mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major
life activities; or any other disability as defined under state
or federal law, including the Americans with Disabilities Act.
(d) "School" means any child care, early education,
elementary, secondary, or postsecondary educational setting.
(e) "State agency" means a separate agency or unit of
state government created or established by law and any entity
under the control of or established for the benefit of a state
agency.
(2) COMMUNICATION RIGHTS.—
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 533 2026
(a) An individual with a disability has the right to
communicate in his or her preferred manner. A state agency, a
school, or a health care provider in this state may not restrict
or deny an individual with a disability access to his or her
preferred alternative communication method.
(b) Alternative communication methods recognized under
this section include, but are not limited to, all of the
following:
1. Augmentative and alternative communication devices.
2. Letterboards and typing-based communication.
3. Sign language and nonverbal gestural systems.
4. Speech-generating devices or other assistive
technologies.
(c) Individuals with disabilities have the right to:
1. Have their preferred alternative communication method
recognized and supported in educational, health, and public
settings.
2. Access needed speech-language therapy and communication
support from licensed professionals without arbitrary
restrictions.
3. Have reasonable access to trained staff in public
facilities or programs to support their specialized
communication needs.
4. Receive communication support from trained staff,
including agency staff, direct-support professionals, educators,
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 533 2026
and health care providers.
5. Be free from bans or restrictions on their preferred
alternative communication methods.
(3) AGENCY RESPONSIBILITIES.—
(a) The agency shall adopt rules to implement this
section, including a statement of rights and the obligations of
staff and providers required to observe the communication rights
of individuals with disabilities under this section.
(b) The agency shall develop training programs for direct-
support professionals, educators, and health care staff. The
training must include, but need not be limited to, instruction
on all of the following:
1. Communication accommodations and alternative
communication methods.
2. The requirements of this section, including supporting
an individual's preferred alternative communication method
unless another method is agreed upon by the individual or his or
her legal guardian.
(4) COMMUNICATION RIGHTS ADVISORY BOARD.—The Communication
Rights Advisory Board is created within the agency to advise the
agency on matters relating to individuals with disabilities.
(a) The board shall be composed of 15 members, at least 7
of whom must be individuals with disabilities or family members
or guardians of individuals with disabilities and the remainder
100 of whom must be either professionals who, in the course of their
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 533 2026
101 respective professions, treat or serve individuals with
102 disabilities or representatives of disability advocacy
103 organizations. Board members shall be appointed as follows:
104 1. Three members appointed by the Governor.
105 2. Three members appointed by the President of the Senate.
106 3. Three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
107 Representatives.
108 4. Three members appointed by the Minority Leader of the
109 Senate.
110 5. Three members appointed by the Minority Leader of the
111 House of Representatives.
112 (b) The board shall do all of the following:
113 1. Advise the agency on the implementation of this
114 section.
115 2. Review policies and practices to ensure compliance with
116 communication rights enumerated under this section.
117 3. Submit an annual report to the Governor, the President
118 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
119 (c) In accordance with s. 20.052(8), this subsection is
120 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
121 through reenactment by the Legislature.
122 (5) ENFORCEMENT.—
123 (a) The agency shall establish procedures for individuals
124 with disabilities or their representatives to report violations
125 of this section.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 533 2026
126 (b) Violations of this section are subject to a civil
127 penalty of $500 per violation in addition to any other
128 administrative action imposed in accordance with s. 393.0673 or
129 s. 408.813, as applicable, for such violation.
130 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb533-00